Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of
Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services from any monies not
otherwise appropriated from the Statewide Recovery Fund of the State
Treasury created in Section 255 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, the sum of Seven Million Nine Hundred Twenty-nine Thousand
Five Hundred Ninety-six Dollars and forty-five cents ($7,929,596.45)
or so much thereof as may be necessary to address the ongoing
increased demand for mental health services by expanding the
infrastructure of the Tulsa Center for Behavioral Health to increase
capacity. Such funds shall be utilized in a manner consistent with
the recommendations adopted by the Joint Committee on Pandemic
Relief Funding on May 12, 2025.
SECTION 2. REAPPROPRIATION AND REDESIGNATION
The amount of Sixty-six Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars
($66,500,000.00) of the original appropriation of Eighty-seven
Million Dollars ($87,000,000.00), appropriated to the Department of

Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services by Section 1 of Enrolled
House Bill No. 1013 of the 2nd Extraordinary Session of the 58th
Oklahoma Legislature, from any monies not otherwise appropriated
from the Statewide Recovery Fund of the State Treasury created in
Section 255 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes, to address the
ongoing increased demand for mental health services by constructing
a replacement facility for Griffin Memorial Hospital, provided that
such construction be confined within a thirty-mile radius of the
State Capitol Building, is hereby reappropriated and redesignated to
address the ongoing increased demand for mental health services by
purchasing and renovating a replacement facility for Griffin
Memorial Hospital; provided, that such facility be confined within a
thirty-mile radius of the State Capitol Building and to retain a
third-party construction manager with experience in behavioral
health hospitals to assist in this project. Such funds shall be
utilized in a manner consistent with the recommendations adopted by
the Joint Committee on Pandemic Relief Funding on May 12, 2025. If,
on the date this act is approved, any of the amount originally
appropriated, as adjusted by expenditures, encumbrances and
transfers, results in an unencumbered balance less than the
reappropriated and redesignated amount, that reappropriated and
redesignated amount is reduced to the unencumbered amount.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1178 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 20th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1178 Page 3